Tennessee, session 114, HB0893.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 69-7-304(a), is amended by adding
the following language after the existing language:
A list of withdrawals registered pursuant to this subsection (a) must be made
available in a publicly accessible location on the department's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0893
002248
- 1 -